Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-925
Comprehensive degree offerings, defined.

Comprehensive degree offerings shall mean the awarding by a system, area, or institution of degrees, including but not limited to associate, bachelor's, master's, specialist, or doctorate, in a variety of academic or vocational program areas.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 9.